apertium-bn-en.bn.dix
    <pardef n="চেক /ভাঙ্গা__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গেতে</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গেতে</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="impers"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গেতে</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গেতে</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গেতে</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গেতে</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গেতে</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গেতে</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গেতে</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গেতে</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গেতে</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গেতে</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গেতে</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গেতে</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গাবে</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গাবেনা</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গেও</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গেওনা</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গাস</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গাসনে</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গাবেন</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গাবেননা</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গাবে</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গাবেনা</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গাবেন</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গাবেননা</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গাবে</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গাবেনা</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="impers"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গাব</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গাবনা</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গাবে</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গাবেনা</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গাবি</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গাবিনা</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গাবেন</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গাবেননা</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গাবে</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গাবেনা</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গাবেন</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গাবেননা</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গাওয়া</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>না</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গেতে</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>না</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গাবার</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf2"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>না</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf2"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গেয়েছিল</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গায়নি</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="impers"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গেয়েছিলাম</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গাইনি</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গেয়েছিলে</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গাওনি</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গেয়েছিলি</l>
          <r>ভাঙ্গা<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ভাঙ্গাসনি</l>

    <e lm="চেক ভাঙ্গা"><i>চেক </i><par n="চেক /ভাঙ্গা__vblex"/></e>
